Tennessee, session 114, HB0507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-1-303(b), is amended by deleting
the language "annual report to the governor and" and substituting "annual report to the
governor, the legislative librarian, and the".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0507
001632
- 1 -